Utah statutes.
63M-7-518.   Failure to comply.
If a person refuses to comply with an order under this chapter or asserts a
privilege, except privileges arising from the attorney-client relationship, to
withhold or suppress evidence relevant to a claim, the director or reparations
officer may make any appropriate determination including denial of the claim.
